Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 3. Small Businessman’s Loan Assistance Law of 1972.

§ 57-10-101.
Short title.

This article shall be called the “Small Businessman’s Loan Assistance Law of 1972.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-131; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 57-10-103.
Declaration of intent; construction.

The increasing need for commercial financing at reasonable rates for the small businessman necessitates a new loan guaranty program in order that the economy of the state may continue to grow and prosper. It is the intent of this article to encourage small business loans by furnishing lending institutions additional security to place such loans on a sound, financial basis and reap statewide benefits resulting from an expanded economy. This article is intended to strengthen the economic security of this state and insure its permanent financial well-being.

This article is hereby declared to be a public necessity, is remedial in purpose, and should be liberally construed to effect its purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-132; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 57-10-105.
Definitions.

Whenever the following terms or similar terms are used herein they shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Borrower” means any individual, firm, partnership or corporation approved by the committee, residing in Mississippi who applies for or borrows money from any lender under the provisions of this article.

“Lender” shall mean any state or national bank, savings and loan association or insurance company doing business in Mississippi, which is approved by the committee.

“Manager” means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation.

“Committee” means the Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc., created pursuant to Section 57-10-167.

“Loan guaranty” means additional security to the lender by the state for loans to small businessmen in this state.

“Guaranty fee fund” means a revolving fund maintained in the State Treasury as a separate fund composed of guaranty fee payments from loans made under the provisions of this article.

“Small businessman’s loan fund” means a separate and additional fund maintained in the State Treasury by appropriation from the state Legislature and used exclusively to guarantee loans as herein provided.

“Transfer” means to loan, to give, to make available or to pass control of any available funds held in paragraphs (f) and (g) above to the Mississippi Economic Development Corporation, or its successor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-133; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 422, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 12; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 46; Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 6, 2001.).

§ 57-10-107.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 15, eff from and after March 30, 1983.

[Codes, 1942, § 8940-134; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 4]

§ 57-10-109.
Manager.

The manager shall be required to have a surety bond in an amount to be fixed by the committee.

The manager, subject to the approval of the committee, is authorized to employ such additional technical, clerical and stenographic assistance as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. It is hereby made the duty of all of the departments and agencies of the state government to give aid and assistance to the manager in administering this program.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-137; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 7; Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 6, 2001.).

§ 57-10-111.
General powers and duties of committee.

The committee is authorized and empowered to prepare and promulgate reasonable rules, regulations and policies for applications for loans, credit instruments, and any and all other forms, rules, policies, regulations or procedures desirable in order to carry out the provisions of this article. The committee shall determine the amount of the guaranty fee to be paid under the provisions of this article, subject to the limitations set forth in Section 57-10-115. Such guaranty fee payments shall be deposited in the guaranty fee fund. It shall also be the duty of the committee to formulate the policies to be administered by the manager under the provisions of this article. The function of the committee shall be that of policy-making and the functions of the manager shall be administrative.

In addition to the power and authority granted herein, the committee is hereby authorized to use any available funds in the small businessman’s loan fund or the guaranty fee fund to be used for any authorized and legal purposes as contained in Sections 57-10-1 through 57-10-41, irrespective and notwithstanding any limitations, restrictions or other provisions of this article.

It is the intent of this section and the 1982 and 1983 amendments to Article 1 and Article 3 of this chapter, that the small businessman’s loan program and the Mississippi Economic Development Corporation program shall pool and combine the resources and efforts of each to make them more readily available to the needs of the small businessmen and women of this state.

However, in the event a loan is made to the Mississippi Economic Development Corporation or its successor, the maximum liability limit as expressed in Sections 57-10-115(3) and 57-10-133 shall automatically be reduced by an amount equal to five (5) times the amount of the loan.

The committee is hereby authorized and empowered to establish and put in effect reasonable terms and conditions on any and all such transfers to the corporation regarding repayment of any transfers and security therefor, if applicable, default provisions and annual reporting on the status of any transfer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-136; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 6; Laws, 1982, ch. 422, § 5; Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1983).

§ 57-10-113.
Eligibility for loan guaranty.

A borrower may apply to the committee for a loan guaranty necessary to meet the lender’s approval of the loan. The borrower must demonstrate his inability to obtain conventional financing, and thus the need for the state loan guaranty.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-135; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 5; Laws, 1995, ch. 548, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1995).

§ 57-10-115.
Loan guaranty fee; loan limitations and restrictions.

On every loan, the borrower shall pay a nonrefundable guaranty fee of two percent (2%) of the guaranteed portion, to be paid at the time of disbursement of loan proceeds. Upon collection, the committee shall remit all such guaranty fees to a special fund for such fees created by the State Treasurer.

No loan guaranty made by the committee shall exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the principal of the loan.

The amount of all outstanding loan guaranties shall not exceed five (5) times the combined total amount in the Small Businessman’s Loan Fund, plus the guaranty fee fund and accrued interest on both funds, provided the liability of the two (2) funds shall not exceed Fifteen Million Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($15,750,000.00).

No guaranty made under the provisions of this article shall be an amount exceeding Three Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($375,000.00) principal, and the term thereof shall not exceed twenty (20) years.

More than one (1) loan may be outstanding to any one (1) borrower at any one (1) time; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of all loan guaranties to any one (1) borrower shall not exceed Three Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($375,000.00).

The total amount of a loan secured by any real and/or personal property, including any previous indebtedness incurred against real and/or personal property offered as security for such loan, shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the market value as determined by an appraisal made by the lender. In determining the amount of indebtedness to be incurred against any real or personal property securing such a loan, the lender may consider the enhanced value of the real property and any other additional capital assets accruing to the borrower through loans provided under this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-138; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 8; Laws, 1973, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 552, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 371, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 405, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 324; Laws, 1984, ch. 308; Laws, 1988, ch. 499; Laws, 1989, ch. 524, § 23; Laws, 1995, ch. 548, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1995).

§ 57-10-117.
Supplementary security requirement for corporate borrower.

If there is a corporate borrower, the committee shall require the personal guarantee or endorsement of any principal or entity owning at least twenty percent (20%) of the corporation that is borrowing money from any lender under the provisions of this article, and the committee may also require any other guarantees it deems appropriate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-139; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 9; Laws, 1995, ch. 548, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1995).

§ 57-10-119.
Advancement of loan in installments.

If the loan is approved and the lender so desires, the loan, where feasible, may be advanced in installments under such rules and regulations as the committee may establish.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-140; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 57-10-121.
Proceedings by lender upon default on loan; assignment of unsatisfied judgment to state.

If the borrower defaults in the payment of any loan or any installments thereof, fails to follow his plan and applies any installment or installments of his loan to purposes other than those in his plan as certified by the committee, violates any of the covenants and conditions contained in the instrument securing the loan, or fails to comply with any other provision of this article, the lender shall proceed to collect the entire amount due under the loan.

In the event the lender proceeds to collect the loan, he shall be required to follow the procedures as established by the committee and shall not have a claim against either the guaranty fee fund or the small businessman’s loan fund in the state treasury unless or until he has first exhausted his legal rights and remedies in aid of the collection of the loan which include, but are not limited to, his rights under the following: (a) promissory note or notes and signers or endorsers thereon; (b) deeds of trust and mortgages; (c) security agreements; and (d) any set-offs or counterclaims which include the right to foreclose the deeds of trust or mortgages and to sell, or cause to be sold, the property secured thereby and obtain a judgment or decree for any balance remaining due on the loan after such foreclosures and sale of the property given as security.

When the lender has obtained a judgment or decree against the borrower for any deficiency in the amount of the principal of the loan and interest not realized in the sale of the mortgaged property or otherwise, the lender must have execution issued on any such judgment or decree. If the judgment is not satisfied following execution, the lender shall then assign the judgment or decree to the State of Mississippi, using such form of assignment as may be prescribed by regulation promulgated by the committee, before either of the two (2) said funds in the state treasury may be liable in anywise for the benefit of the lender; however, the committee may determine that it is economically or legally infeasible for the lender to obtain a judgment or decree against the borrower, such determination and the reasons therefor to be reflected in the minutes of the committee. Upon the making of such a determination, the committee will succeed to whatever rights the lender may possess in place of a judgment or decree.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-141; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 11; Laws, 1981, ch. 417, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1981).

§ 57-10-123.
Filing of claim for payment of loan from state funds.

If the requirements appearing heretofore in Section 57-10-121 have been met by the lender and any sum of money remains due on the principal of the loan, the lender must file with the manager, on the form prescribed by the committee, the lender’s claim for the amount of principal remaining due and outstanding under the loan. The claim shall be accompanied by papers showing that the lender has exhausted his legal rights and remedies in an effort to collect the loan, or that such requirement was waived by the committee, and must include an assignment of the judgment from the lender to the State of Mississippi, or an assignment of rights that the lender may possess in the event requirement of judgment has been waived. In the event that the borrower has declared bankruptcy, then the lender must submit a final order of the bankruptcy court in that cause or such other documents that prove to the satisfaction of the committee that the lender has first exhausted his legal rights and remedies in aid of his collection of the loan. The committee shall review these papers and the claim by the lender and if the committee is satisfied that the same are in due form and meet the requirements under this article, the full committee shall allow the claim and issue its requisition according to law to the state auditor against the guaranty fee fund in the State Treasury for the balance of the principal under the loan. The state auditor shall, after determination of the legal validity of the claim, issue a warrant therefor which shall be honored by the State Treasurer by payment out of said guaranty fee fund in the State Treasury.

If the balance remaining in the guaranty fee fund of the state treasury is insufficient to pay the amount of the principal of the loan remaining due, as shown by the written certificate of the State Treasurer to the manager, then the committee shall issue its requisition according to law, for the amount of the principal remaining due under the loan against the small businessman’s loan fund on which the state auditor shall issue his warrant, which shall be honored by the State Treasurer to the limit of the funds allowable in the small businessman’s loan fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-142; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 12; Laws, 1975, ch. 355; Laws, 1981, ch. 417, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1981).

§ 57-10-125.
Collection of debt to state.

If either the guaranty fee fund or the small businessman’s loan fund becomes liable for any principal due under any loan and any payment is made from either fund to the lender in payment of the balance of the principal remaining due under such loan, the amount thus paid shall become a debt due the State of Mississippi in favor of the fund from which said balance for the principal of the loan was paid, or prorate with the balance of the principal that was paid from the guaranty fee fund and the small businessman’s loan fund, which debt shall bear interest at the legal rate. It shall be the duty of the attorney, selected pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, to collect said debt with interest and the attorney shall also collect the balance of the loan, representing interest due the lender over and above the principal which will likewise bear interest at the legal rate after the judgment is obtained. The committee may authorize the attorney to settle and compromise any debt due under the provisions of this section.

In order to effect a collection pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the committee is authorized and empowered, subject to the approval of the attorney general, to hire an attorney and compensate him on either a fixed or contingent fee basis.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-143; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 13; Laws, 1979, ch. 366, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1979).

§ 57-10-127.
Distribution of collections by state.

Methods of distribution of all of the collections made by the district attorney or county attorney, where either or both of the funds in the state treasury have become liable for the principal due under any such loan and payment of the remaining balance due on the principal of the loan have been paid from either the guaranty fee fund or small businessman’s loan fund, shall be as follows: (a) first, the amount of the principal of the loan which has been paid out of either the guaranty fee fund or the small businessman’s loan fund shall be deposited to the fund from which it was withdrawn, or on a pro rata basis; (b) next, the interest due the lender on the loan unpaid up to and including the date of the assignment of the judgment from the lender to the State of Mississippi shall be paid to the lender; (c) then, the remainder of the proceeds, if any, shall be applied to the payment of interest to the guaranty fee fund or small businessman’s loan fund, at the legal rate from the date that said fund was called upon to indemnify the lender.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-145; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 57-10-129.
Extent of liability of state funds.

The extent of the liability of either the guaranty fee fund or the small businessman’s loan fund to the lender shall be seventy-five percent (75%) of the principal remaining due and unpaid after the lender has fully exhausted all remedies for recovery as provided herein, and neither of these funds shall be liable for interest which the borrower owes the lender under any such loan.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-144; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 57-10-131.
Investment of moneys in state funds.

The small businessman’s loan fund and at least three-fourths (3/4) of the guaranty fee fund shall be invested in interest-bearing notes or savings accounts for the highest possible yield as determined by the committee. However, not more than ten percent (10%) of the combined total of the two (2) funds shall be invested in interest-bearing notes or savings accounts of the banks from which the two (2) executive bank officers are chosen to be members of the small businessman’s loan committee according to Section 57-10-107.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-146; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 57-10-133.
Acceptance of federal and private grant funds.

The committee is hereby authorized and empowered to accept federal and private grant funds and to use same for all purposes. The committee may use any such federal or private grant funds to establish a supplemental loan guaranty fund with the state treasury and may make additional loan guaranties on the basis of such fund; provided that the aggregate amount of such additional loan guaranties shall not at any time exceed five (5) times the amount on deposit in such supplemental loan guaranty fund; provided further, that the aggregate of the liability for such supplemental loan guaranty fund and the liability authorized by Section 57-10-115(3) shall not exceed seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars ($17,500,000.00) at any one (1) time.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-147; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 17; Laws, 1973, ch. 468, § 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 552, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 450, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 371, § 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 343, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 405, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 57-10-135.
Liability of state and subdivisions for obligations and guarantees assumed by state funds.

Obligations and guarantees assumed by the small businessman’s loan fund and the guaranty fee fund under the provisions of the guaranty program shall not be in any way an obligation, loan, debt or liability of the State of Mississippi or of any political subdivision thereof other than the small businessman’s loan fund and the guaranty fee fund. They shall not create or constitute any obligation, liability or indebtedness of the state or of any political subdivision, or be or constitute a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any political subdivision, and all indebtedness or obligations shall be payable solely from revenues or funds available for their payment as authorized herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-148; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 57-10-137.
Transfer of moneys to general fund upon termination of program.

If the program provided by this article is terminated or discontinued for any reason in the future, all monies in the guaranty fee fund and small businessman’s loan fund in the state treasury shall, after payment of all outstanding indebtedness, be transferred to the general fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-149; Laws, 1972, ch. 441, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1972.